Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6752YH (3) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2409 Section 1. Section 68A.502, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. A contribution made to a candidate 3 or candidateâs committee by a person who is not an eligible 4 elector, as defined in section 39.3, that is a resident of 5 the state, district, county, township, city, ward, or other 6 political subdivision that is represented by the office sought 7 by the candidate, as reflected in the statement of organization 8 filed pursuant to section 68A.201. 9